Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.010

Declaration of purpose.

The general purpose of this chapter is to establish for the state a system of personnel administration based on merit principles and scientific methods governing the appointment, promotion, transfer, layoff, recruitment, retention, classification and pay plan, removal, discipline, training and career development, and welfare of its civil employees, and other incidents of state employment. All appointments and promotions to positions, and retention therein, in the state service, shall be made on the basis of policies hereinafter specified.

[ 1980 c 118 s 1; 1961 c 1 s 1 (Initiative Measure No. 207, approved November 8, 1960).]

NOTES:

Severability—1980 c 118: "If any provision of this 1980 act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1980 c 118 s 10.]